West Virginia, session 2026, SB562.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Food Is Medicine services under the Medicaid program. (a) Legislative findings and purpose. – The Legislature finds that nutrition-related chronic diseases are prevalent among Medicaid members in West Virginia and contribute to poor health outcomes and increased health care costs. The purpose of this section is to authorize the use of nutrition-based interventions, known as Food Is Medicine services, as a cost-effective strategy to improve health outcomes and reduce avoidable medical utilization.(b) Authority. – In accordance with the Rural Health Transformation Program, the Department of Human Services, through the Bureau for Medical Services, shall permit and encourage Medicaid managed care organizations to offer Food Is Medicine services within the state Medicaid program.(c) Program design. – Food Is Medicine services offered pursuant to this section shall be designed to improve health outcomes for Medicaid members with nutrition related chronic diseases through nutrition supports and related services that reduce the need for higher cost medical care.(d) Allowable services. – Food Is Medicine services include, but are not limited to:(1) Nutrition-related case management;(2) Nutrition counseling provided by qualified professionals;(3) Medically tailored meals;(4) Produce prescriptions; and(5) Grocery provisions intended to support medically appropriate diets.(e) Prioritization of local food. – Where feasible and consistent with Medicaid requirements, the Bureau for Medical Services shall encourage managed care organizations and their contracted entities to partner with community-based organizations and to prioritize the use of food grown or produced by local farmers and food producers in West Virginia.(f) Oversight and implementation. – The Bureau for Medical Services shall provide guidance to managed care organizations regarding the implementation of Food Is Medicine services under this section and may establish standards, reporting expectations, and quality measures to ensure program integrity and effectiveness.(g) Effective date. – This act shall be effective upon passage.